FR940621-0-00031 FR940621-0-00016 DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration 50 CFR Part 649 [Docket No. 940366&hyph;4165; I.D. 021494E] RIN 0648&hyph;AF39 American Lobster Fishery AGENCY: National Marine Fisheries Service (NMFS), National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration (NOAA), Commerce. ACTION: Final rule. SUMMARY: NMFS issues this final rule to implement measures in Amendment 5 to the Fishery Management Plan for the American Lobster Fishery (FMP). Amendment 5 is intended to eliminate overfishing of American lobsters in the exclusive economic zone (EEZ), with anticipated complementary management action in state waters. A final rule published on May 20, 1994 (59 FR 26454), implemented one of the measures approved under Amendment 5_maintenance of the current 31/4-inch (8.26&hyph;cm) minimum carapace length. This rule implements the remaining measures approved under Amendment 5: Limits on the issuance of new Federal vessel permits for a 5-year period, change in escape vent width, dealer permits, operator permits, a framework process to develop a stock rebuilding program, and a revised definition of overfishing. EFFECTIVE DATE: July 20, 1994. ADDRESSES: Copies of Amendment 5, its regulatory impact review (RIR), initial regulatory flexibility analysis (IRFA), and the final supplemental environmental impact statement (FSEIS) are available from Douglas Marshall, Executive Director, New England Fishery Management Council, 5 Broadway, Saugus, MA 01906&hyph;1097. Copies of the Finance Handbook may be obtained from Mr. Joseph Giza, Chief, Fiscal Policy and Quality Assurance Branch, NOAA Financial Management Division, Caller Service No. 8025, 20020 Century Boulevard, Germantown, Maryland 20874, telephone: 301&hyph;443&hyph;8795. Comments regarding the burden-hour estimates, or any other aspect of the collection-of-information requirements contained in this final rule, should be sent to the Regional Director, Northeast Region, NMFS, One Blackburn Drive, Gloucester, MA 01930, and the Office of Management and Budget (OMB) (Attention NOAA Desk Officer), Washington, D.C. 20503. FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT: Paul H. Jones, NMFS, Fishery Policy Analyst, 508&hyph;281&hyph;9273. SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION: Background Amendment 5, with some exceptions, was approved by NMFS on May 11, 1994. Background to the amendment was discussed in the proposed rule (59 FR 11029, March 9, 1994), and is not repeated here. Approved Management Measures NMFS is implementing the approved measures of Amendment 5 through two separate final rules. The first was published on May 20, 1994 (59 FR 26454). That final rule maintained the minimum carapace length for lobsters at 31/4 inches (8.26 cm), thereby rescinding the scheduled increases in the minimum size. This rule implements the remaining approved provisions of Amendment 5: (1) A 5-year moratorium on the issuance of new Federal vessel permits, (2) dealer and vessel operator permit requirements, (3) a decrease in the minimum width of the lobster trap escape vent from 6 inches (152.4 mm) to 5&hyph;3/4 inches (146.1 mm), and (4) a framework process that requires the development of a stock rebuilding program in four management areas in the EEZ (Gulf of Maine Near-shore, Southern New England Near-shore, Middle Atlantic Near-shore, and Offshore) by the end of the first year of implementation of Amendment 5. The framework process calls for the establishment of Effort Management Teams (EMTs) for each management area to develop area-specific management measures. Amendment 5 also revises the overfishing definition for American lobster to read: The resource is recruitment overfished when, throughout its range, the fishing mortality rate (F), given the regulations in place at that time under the suite of regional management measures, results in a reduction in estimated egg production per recruit to 10 percent or less of a non-fished population (F 814 10% ) With respect to the definition, the Amendment also specifies that the development of the status of the stock report and the evaluation of fishery-induced effects will consider information based upon one or more indices, including but not limited to: (1) Larval abundance index in surface waters, (2) larval settlement index, (3) pre-recruit indices by year class, (4) landings, (5) size composition of the landings, (6) spawning stock biomass, (7) numbers of egg-bearing females, (8) effort levels and catch per unit of effort, and (9) possible relationships of biological parameters to water temperatures or other environmental parameters. Although much of this information is currently unavailable, it is NMFS' intent to incorporate this information, as appropriate, into the determination of whether the fishery is being overfished when such information can be developed into valid, quantifiable indices of overfishing. Based on the definition, the lobster resource is overfished. To achieve reductions in fishing mortality, Amendment 5 includes a framework process requiring the New England Fishery Management Council (Council) to develop a stock rebuilding program during the first year of implementation. The management measures may include any of the framework measures specified under §649.44(d). These measures may be applied to all segments of the harvesting sector within each management area. To determine which of these measures will be implemented in each of the management areas, Amendment 5 establishes an EMT for each management area. Each EMT is charged with recommending to the Council a stock rebuilding program for its area no later than January 20, 1995. Based on the EMT recommendations, the Council is required to submit framework management measures to the Director, Northeast Region NMFS (Regional Director). This development timeframe is designed to provide industry members within each area with the opportunity to reach a consensus by July 20, 1995 as to which options listed in §649.44(d) should apply in their respective management area. NMFS has informed the Council, in a letter from the Regional Director dated May 11, 1994, that if the EMTs are unable to make their deadline, then NMFS will begin the process of withdrawing the FMP. The Council recommended to NMFS that the initial specification of a seaward boundary line of the Southern New England Near-shore area, which is contiguous with part of the Offshore area, be as set forth in §649.42 (see Figure 3 of part 649). The Council will determine the final location of a boundary line after the EMTs for these areas jointly consider the issue and make a recommendation to the Council. Long Island Sound, under the jurisdiction of the coastal states and not part of the EEZ, is not specifically part of the Southern New England Near-shore area. Amendment 5 includes new permitting requirements for vessel operators and dealers, and limits the requirements for limited access vessel permits for a period of 5 years. During the third year of the new permit requirements, the Council will conduct a formal review to determine whether the limitation on permits is necessary to the stock rebuilding program. The Council may choose to extend the limitation on new permits for a specified period or terminate it if it determines that such action is consistent with the stock rebuilding program. Amendment 5 specifies the lobster fishery control date as March 25, 1991, rather than January 9, 1991, as published in the Federal Register on March 25, 1991 (56 FR 12366). Shortly after publication of the control date of January 9, 1991, the Council agreed to adjust that date to the date of publication of the control date notice_March 25, 1991. The EMTs will consider the following control date guidelines during development of the stock rebuilding program: (1) In the event that a system of assigning fishing rights is developed as part of the FMP, such assignments shall be based on historical levels of participation in the fishery prior to March 25, 1991, with consideration for recent investments that have not yet been reflected in measures of participation; (2) new or re-rigged vessels will be given consideration in the assignment of fishing rights if (a) the vessel was under construction or re-rigging for directed lobster fishing as of March 25, 1991, as evidenced by written construction contracts, work orders, equipment purchases, or other evidence of substantial investment and intent to participate in the lobster fishery; and (b) the vessel possessed an American lobster permit and landed lobster prior to March 25, 1992; (3) historical participation will transfer with a vessel for a transfer made after March 25, 1991, unless such transfer is accompanied by a written document indicating the agreement of both the buyer and the seller that any future fishing rights applicable to that vessel are not being transferred with the vessel; and (4) any system of assigning fishing rights will take into consideration the following concerns relative to individuals or corporations that have sold a vessel within the time that may be chosen to determine historical fishing rights: (a) The degree of economic dependence upon the lobster fishery, including, but not limited to the percentage of income derived from the lobster fishery; (b) the extent of past participation in the lobster fishery; and (c) the demonstration of intent prior to March 25, 1991, to re-enter the lobster fishery with another vessel. Delayed and Disapproved Measures and the Reasons for Disapproval The limited access permit requirements and the vessel operator permit requirements will be implemented in 1995, so that they can be included as part of the 1995 permitting process. The annual permit renewal begins in August-September of each year, and limited access lobster vessel permits and vessel operator permits will be required on January 1, 1995. This implementation schedule will ensure that NMFS can administer the requirement with the minimum burden upon applicants. Three measures proposed in Amendment 5 were disapproved. Two measures were disapproved because they were inconsistent with national standard 4 of the Magnuson Fishery Conservation and Management Act (Magnuson Act), which requires that any allocation of fishing privileges be fair and equitable. These measures would have established three vessel permit categories and would have set a quota for vessels issued a permit and using gear other than lobster pots. The proposed permit categories and quota would have unfairly impacted, without adequate justification, one segment of the fishery while allowing unrestrained increases in other sectors of the fishery. Also disapproved were the Council's proposed mandatory reporting requirements for dealers and vessels. The Council has not demonstrated that the benefits of the mandatory reporting requirements justify the costs, as required by E.O. 12866, particularly in light of the fact that the majority of lobsters are harvested from state waters. NMFS will pursue a cooperative approach with the states to share the costs of such a data collection. Comments and Responses NMFS received comments on the proposed rule from one U.S. Senator, the U.S. Coast Guard, the Council, four Maine state representatives, five fishing industry associations, and nine individuals. All of the comments were carefully considered during the formulation of this final rule. Specific comments are discussed and responded to below. The Council submitted comments requesting several clarifications and changes to the regulatory text. Most of these changes are noted in the Changes from the Proposed Rule section of this preamble. In addition to these changes, the Council requested that a provision restricting party, charter, and dive boats to six or fewer lobsters per person on board be expanded to include any fishing vessel. NMFS is not implementing this provision because it was not included as part of Amendment 5 and, as such, has not received adequate public notice and comment. The Council also requested that vessel owners not be in violation of the prohibition against selling or transferring fish to unpermitted dealers unless the sale or transfer were done knowingly. NMFS has not adopted this change because it would make enforcement of this prohibition almost impossible and because it would be inconsistent with similar prohibitions in other fishery management plans. In any event, NMFS will exercise discretion in enforcing this prohibition in cases where vessel owners could not reasonably be expected to know whether a dealer was validly permitted. Comment : A U.S. Senator, the Coast Guard, four industry associations, and six individuals stated that the amendment should be approved. Response : The comments have been noted and the amendment was partially approved, as explained above. Comment : One individual objected to the specific eligibility criteria for a limited access vessel permit that require a vessel or vessel owner to have been issued a Federal American lobster permit, or a federally endorsed state American lobster permit, and to have landed American lobsters prior to March 25, 1991. Response : This provision complies with the Magnuson Act requirements for establishing a system for limited access to a fishery. If a system for limiting access to a fishery is included in a fishery management plan, the Magnuson Act requires the Council and NMFS to take into account such factors as present participation in the fishery, historical fishing practices and dependence on the fishery, and capability of vessels to be used in other fisheries. The Council and NMFS considered all of these factors in establishing criteria required to qualify for full participation in the American lobster fishery. A control date was announced on March 25, 1991 (56 FR 12366), which gave notice to participants and potential participants that future participation in the fishery may be limited for vessels that entered the fishery after the control date. The purpose of the control date was to discourage increases in fishing effort and speculative entry into the fishery while development of Amendment 5 progressed. Amendment 5 also establishes an exemption to the limited access fishery for party, charter and dive boats in possession of six or fewer lobsters per person, or for recreational vessels and vessels that fish exclusively in state waters for lobsters. Therefore, Amendment 5 provides the opportunity for recreational operators and other types of operators who fish exclusively in state waters to participate in the fishery while discouraging further increases in fishing mortality by limiting the number of participants in the fishery. Comment : Two individuals requested that the boundary line between Management Areas 2 and 3 be omitted. Another requested that Management Area 4 be split into two zones. Response : The Council decided, and NMFS agrees, that a boundary line between the Southern New England Near-shore area and the Offshore area is needed to define the areas in the final rule so that appropriate area specific management measures can be developed. The Council has stated that future boundary lines for the areas will be considered jointly by the EMTs for these areas and that the EMTs will make recommendation on changes to the Council. Comment : Two individuals requested that the boundary line for the Management Areas be specified by Loran C coordinates, rather than by latitude and longitude. Response : All boundary lines listed in Federal fishery regulations are specified by latitude and longitude, because such coordinates are more precise and accurate for enforcement purposes. Comment : Three individuals stated that the amendment should be disapproved because it violates national standards. One industry association stated specifically that Amendment 5 violates: (1) National standard 1, because it does nothing to prevent overfishing; (2) national standard 2, because it does not use the best scientific information available; (3) national standard 3, because the Amendment establishes management zones that do not manage the lobster stock throughout the range of the stock; (4) national standard 4, because the Amendment discriminates against the mobile gear sector; (5) national standard 5, because there are severe restrictions placed on the mobile gear sector and absolutely none on the trap sector; (6) national standard 6, because the Amendment ignores the fact that mobile gear is a variation within the lobster fishery; (7) national standard 7, because, by establishing EMTs, the Amendment does not minimize costs. Response : With the exception of the disapproved portions of Amendment 5 noted above, NMFS has determined that the measures included in Amendment 5 are consistent with all of the national standards. Specific responses to the comments follows. Amendment 5 is consistent with national standard 1 because it mandates a timetable to implement measures to address overfishing based on a specific definition of overfishing, and creates a framework system to change management measures proposed by the Council. The process is designed to develop an industry consensus, through the EMTs and the Council, concerning the most effective management measures to achieve the objectives of the FMP to reduce fishing mortality in each of the four management areas. Thus, Amendment 5, as implemented, specifies the process, the timetable, and the specific biological objectives that will achieve the objectives of the FMP in addressing overfishing. If the Council fails to submit management measures sufficient to meet the FMP objectives, the regulations require the Secretary to determine whether preparation of an amendment to the FMP is necessary. In addition, NMFS stated in a letter notifying the Council of partial disapproval Amendment 5 that it will begin the process to withdraw the American lobster FMP if the EMTs have not submitted recommendations to the Council concerning management measures within 6 months after the effective date of the regulations implementing Amendment 5. Amendment 5 is consistent with national standard 2 because the Council determined, and NMFS agrees, that the NMFS weighout database is the best scientific information available in determining the conservation and management measures. Further, any new available data will be considered in reviewing specific management measures submitted to NMFS under the first-year framework process. National standard 3 states that ``to the extent practicable,'' an individual stock of fish shall be managed as a unit throughout the range. The overall objective of the FMP is to support and promote the development and implementation, on a continuing basis, of a unified, regional management program for lobster. The American lobster FMP and Amendment 5, as implemented by this rule, establishes a system to manage the lobster stock as a unit throughout the range. The provision for management areas recognizes that individual measures to achieve the overall FMP objectives may need to vary because of regional and state differences in how the lobster fishery is conducted. This is consistent with national standard 3, which provides that FMPs need not be identical for each geographic area within the management unit, if the FMP justifies the differences. Since more than 80 percent of the lobster fishery occurs in state waters, this approach is needed to insure consistent, comparable management measures among the various states engaged in the fishery. The measures that create different categories based on gear were disapproved because national standard 4 requires that any allocation of fishing privileges be fair and equitable. The permit categories and quota, although intended only to cap effort and prevent re-direction of effort from other fisheries, impact, without adequate justification, only one segment of the fishery and continue to allow unrestrained increases in other sectors (with the exception of the permit moratorium which affects all sectors equally). Pertaining to national standard 5, the measures that place restrictions on the mobile gear sector have been disapproved for the reasons stated above. Pertaining to national standard 6, for the reasons stated above, gear categories were disapproved. National standard 7 states that, ``where practicable,'' management measures shall minimize costs. This amendment creates EMTs for each of the four management areas to address concerns of geographic differences in the lobster fishery as permitted under national standard 3, as discussed above. Since more than 80 percent of the lobster fishery occurs in state waters, NMFS has determined that this approach is a practicable, cost-efficient way to insure consistent, comparable management measures among the various states bordering the four management areas established by Amendment 5. In particular, this approach is necessary to be consistent with the agency's guidelines on national standard 7, which state that a factor in deciding whether a fishery needs management through regulations implementing an FMP is the need to resolve competing interests and conflicts among user groups and whether a measure can further that resolution. Comment : One individual opposed the requirement for mandatory vessel logbooks. Response : This requirement was disapproved. Comment : Two individuals requested that representation on the EMTs include draggers and divers. Response : Members of each EMT will be appointed by the Council, in consultation with appropriate states and NMFS. This final rule does not restrict or require participation on the EMTs by any specific group or groups. Comment : One individual requested that the definition of recreational fishing vessel be changed to include dive vessels. Response : The definition for recreational fishing vessels includes dive vessels, provided that lobster harvested by dive vessels are not intended to be, nor are they, bartered, traded, or sold. Comment : A U.S. Senator and two industry associations expressed concern with the 100 lobster possession restrictions and the target quota for non-lobster pot vessels. Response : These provisions have been disapproved. Comment : One industry association asked if the wording of the overfishing definition as defined in Amendment 5 will mandate a change in the way future overfishing will be determined. Response : The overfishing definition in the Amendment will be the objective measurement of the status of the lobster stock and complies with the 50 CFR part 602 guidelines. Comment : Four Maine state legislators expressed concern over conflicting state and Federal American lobster regulations. Response : The overall objective of the FMP is to support and promote the development and implementation, on a continuing basis, of a unified, regional management program for lobster. The final rule published on May 20, 1994 (59 FR 26454) is consistent with this objective by maintaining the minimum size at 31/4 inches (8.26 cm). Comment : Four Maine state representatives expressed concern that the Maine Legislature's Joint Standing Committee on Maine Resources was not contacted to discuss any perceived or actual concerns about the lobster resource. Response : The Coastal Zone Management Act requires that the coastal zone agency of each state affected by Amendment 5 be contacted and asked whether they agree that the amendment is consistent, to the maximum extent practicable, with their federally approved coastal zone management program. On February 7, 1994, the Council sent a letter to the Coastal Program Manager for the State of Maine, and on February 11, 1994, the Council received a reply from the State of Maine that determined the amendment was consistent with the enforceable policies of the Maine Coastal Program. In addition, the Commissioner of the Maine Department of Marine Resources serves on the Council. Comment : One industry association expressed concern that the wording under §649.9(d)(1) does not exempt recreational vessels. Response : NMFS has modified §649.4(a) and §649.9(d)(1) to clarify that recreational vessels are exempt from the permit requirements. Comment : One industry association pointed out that recreational fishing vessels, as defined in the proposed rule, were not limited to six or fewer American lobsters per person aboard the vessel at any time. Response : It was not the intent of Amendment 5 to restrict the recreational fishery for American lobsters. However, by definition, recreational vessels are prohibited from bartering, trading, or selling lobster. Comment : One individual objected to the requirement for an operator permit and stated that it should be the responsibility of the vessel owner to make sure that the vessel operator is fully aware of, and follows, all regulations. Response : The intent of this measure is to improve regulatory compliance by those who are most directly able to control the actions of the vessel and crew. The number of operators having their permit suspended or revoked is expected to be relatively small. Penalties would be assessed against a vessel operator only if the vessel operator is determined to have been involved in a major violation or is a significant repeat offender of Federal fishing regulations. The language gives notice to the vessel operator that his/her right and privilege to operate and serve on a federally permitted fishing vessel is subject to the condition that right may be suspended or revoked in certain circumstances. Without the possibility of suspending or revoking an operator's right to serve in any capacity on a federally permitted vessel, the purpose of requiring operator's permits would be meaningless. The language also puts the operator on notice that he/she will be responsible for his/her actions and will not be able to move to another vessel should a suspension occur. It is consistent with a vessel permit suspension, which takes the vessel out of the fishery during the time of suspension. Changes from the Proposed Rule Changes were made to several sections of the proposed rule to clarify the measures and to ensure consistency with other fishery regulations. In addition, substantive changes are made to the following sections: In §649.1, the narrative within the first paragraph is modified to add the phrase ``This part implements the Fishery Management Plan for the American Lobster Fishery (FMP), as amended by the New England Fishery Management Council in consultation with the Mid-Atlantic Fishery Management Council and the Atlantic States Marine Fisheries Commission (ASMFC), and approved by the Assistant Administrator for Fisheries'' to clarify further the purpose and scope of the FMP. In §649.2, the definition of an ``Effort Monitoring Team'' is modified to add the phrase ``a group of American lobster industry representatives (appointed by the Council)'' to clarify who the appointing authority is for the EMT. In §649.2, the definition of a ``ghost panel'' is modified to add the phrase ``after a period of time if the'' to clarify the meaning of a ghost panel. In §649.2, the definition of ``Lobster Plan Development Team'' is not used in these regulations and is deleted from this final rule. In §649.2, the definition of a ``lobster pot trawl'' is added. In §649.2, the definitions of ``reporting month and reporting week'' are deleted from this final rule. The vessel and dealer reporting requirement measures were disapproved by NMFS; therefore, these definitions are no longer necessary. In §649.2, the definition of ``sixth tail segment'' is not used in these regulations and is deleted from this final rule. In §649.2, the definition of a ``whole American lobster'' is modified to add the phrase ``A cull whole American lobster is an American lobster with one or both claws missing,'' to clarify the meaning of a whole American lobster. In §649.4 paragraphs (a)(1), (2), and (3) are added to clarify NMFS' intent to allow 1994 permits to remain effective until December 31, 1994, and the remaining paragraphs of the section are redesignated accordingly. In §649.4(b), the narrative in the introductory text is modified to add the phrase ``From January 1, 1995, through December 31, 1999,'' to clarify NMFS' intent to start issuing limited access American lobster permits in 1995 and that this permit requirement will expire at the end of 1999. In the same paragraph, the phrase ``not intended for or resulting in trade, barter or sale'' is added to clarify which vessels do not require a limited access American lobster permit. In §649.4(b)(1)(B), the phrase ``or federally endorsed state American lobster permit,'' is added to clarify that a vessel issued a federally endorsed state American lobster permit can also qualify for a limited access permit. In §649.4(b)(2), the phrase ``for the years after 1996 - 1999'' is added to clarify the intent of Amendment 5 to limit the issuance of limited access vessel permits for a period of 5 years. In §649.4, paragraph (b)(2)(ii) is added to clarify the intent of Amendment 5 to limit the issuance of limited access vessel permits for a period of 5 years. In §649.4(e), the word ``overall'' is added to clarify what vessel length information is needed. In §649.4(h), the phrase ``A Federal American lobster permit will expire upon the renewal date specified in the permit'' is added to correct a statement in the proposed rule. In §649.5(a), the phrase ``Beginning on January 1, 1995,'' is added to clarify NMFS' intent to require operator permits beginning in 1995, the phrase ``not intended for or resulting in trade, barter or sale'' is added to clarify further who does not require a vessel operator permit, and text is added to clarify further the requirement for an operator permit. In §649.5, paragraph (g) was revised to correct an error in the proposed rule. In §649.6(b), the sentence, ``For 1994, a copy of an applicant's completed application will serve as a temporary permit until the applicant has received a permanent permit.'' is added. Since dealers are required to have Federal permits upon the effective date of this final rule, there is not sufficient time for applicants to comply with the requirement to have their permit application submitted 30 days prior to the date they desire the permit to be effective. This will alleviate that problem. In §649.6(e), the phrase ``and the applicant has submitted all applicable reports specified in §649.7(a)'' is deleted. The vessel and dealer reporting requirement measures were disapproved by NMFS; therefore, this phrase is no longer necessary. In §649.6, paragraph (f) is revised to correct a statement in the proposed rule. In §649.8(a)(6), the phrase ``unless such gear has been rendered unfishable'' is added to allow for the retrieval of lost gear or the unintentional catching of lost lobster pots by trawl vessels and subsequent repairing or destroying of the gear on shore. In §649.8(b), the phrase ``or unless the vessel is a recreational vessels or vessel fishing for American lobsters exclusively in state waters'' is added to clarify exemptions to this prohibition. In §649.8(c)(5), the phrase ``Beginning on January 1, 1995,'' is added to clarify that the operator permit requirement is not effective until 1995. In §649.8, paragraph (c)(10) is added to codify the statutory requirements under section 307(1)(J) of the Magnuson Act. In §649.8(c)(1)(iii) is modified to add the phrase ``per person on board the vessel and the'' was added to clarify further the intent of the prohibition. In §649.20, the section heading is revised to clarify the meaning of the section, and paragraphs (b)(3), (d)(3), and (e)(3) were added to codify the statutory requirements under section 307(1)(J) of the Magnuson Act. In §649.23, the prohibition on transferring fish from one vessel to another while at sea is deleted because the landing and quota requirements proposed by the Council have been disapproved and this measure is no longer necessary. In §649.42, point I is added to the table in paragraph (b)(2) because it was inadvertently omitted in the proposed rule, and the heading of paragraph (b)(4) is modified to add the word ``EEZ'' to clarify that the near-shore waters referred to in the table are in Federal waters. In §649.43, paragraph (b)(11) is redesignated paragraph (b)(12), a new paragraph (b)(11) is added to clarify the Council's intent that the control date guidelines be retained for consideration by the EMTs, and paragraph (b)(12) is revised to clarify the Council's intent on recommending adjustments or additions to management measures. In §649.43, paragraph (e) is redesignated paragraph (f), and a new paragraph (e) is added to clarify that the Council is not precluded from taking necessary management actions in year 1 by the other requirements of §649.43. In §649.44(c), the references to Plan Development Teams (PDTs) are deleted to clarify that frameworks, as described in Amendment 5 are tied to EMTs, specifically. PDTs may, at the discretion of the Council, develop independent findings and recommendations. Also, the phrase ``shall provide the appropriate rationale and economic and biological analysis for its recommendation, utilizing the most current catch, effort, and other relevant data from the fishery'' is removed from paragraph (c) of this section, and placed in §649.44(d) to clarify further the Council's intent on who should prepare the required analysis. In §649.44, paragraph (d)(11) is redesignated to (d)(12), and a new paragraph (b)(11) is added to clarify the Council's intent that the control date guidelines be retained. Redesignated paragraph (d)(12) is revised to clarify the Council's intent on recommending adjustments or additions to management measures. Since all recordkeeping and reporting requirements contained in §649.7 were disapproved, sections 649.8 (Vessel identification), 649.9 (prohibitions), 649.10 (Facilitation and enforcement), and 649.11 (penalties) in the proposed rule are redesignated as §§649.7, 649.8, 649.9, and 649.10, respectively, in this final rule. Since the contents of §649.22 (possession restrictions and target quota), 649.23 (transfer at sea), and 649.24 (restrictions on trawl gear while in the trap fishery) in the proposed rule were disapproved, §649.25 (experimental fishing exemption) of the proposed rule is redesignated as §649.22 in this final rule. Republication of Part of 50 CFR Part 649 A revised version of §649.20(b)(1) and (2) was published in the first final rule (59 FR 26454, May 20, 1994) for Amendment 5, effective May 17, 1994. Those paragraphs are republished here for the convenience of the reader so as to have the entire 50 CFR part 649 published together. Classification The General Counsel of the Department of Commerce certified to the Small Business Administration when this rule was proposed that if adopted, it would not have a significant impact on a substantial number of small entities. Therefore, an initial regulatory flexibility analysis was not prepared. This rule contains two new collection-of-information requirements and two revisions to existing requirements previously approved by OMB. These collection-of-information requirements have been approved by OMB. Nevertheless, public comments are invited on the burden-hour estimates for the collection of information requirements as listed below. The new reporting requirements are: 1. Dealer permits, OMB Control No. 0648&hyph;0202, (5 min./response); 2. Operator permits, OMB Control No. 0648&hyph;0202, (1 hour/response). Revisions to the existing requirements are: 1. Vessel permits, OMB Control No. 0648&hyph;0202, (1 hour/response); 2. Vessel permits, appeal of denied vessel permit, OMB Control No. 0648&hyph;0202, (3 hours/response); This final rule has been determined to be not significant for purposes of E.O. 12866. List of Subjects in 50 CFR Part 649 Fisheries. Dated: June 14, 1994. Charles Karnella, Acting Program Management Officer, National Marine Fisheries Service. For the reasons set out in the preamble, 50 CFR part 649 is revised to read as follows: PART 649_AMERICAN LOBSTER FISHERY Subpart A_General Provisions Sec. 649.1␣Purpose and scope. 649.2␣Definitions. 649.3␣Relation to other laws. 649.4␣Vessel permits. 649.5␣Operator permits. 649.6␣Dealer permits. 649.7␣Vessel identification. 649.8␣Prohibitions. 649.9␣Facilitation of enforcement. 649.10␣Penalties. Subpart B_Management Measures 649.20␣Harvesting and landing requirements. 649.21␣Gear identification and marking, escape vent, and ghost panel requirements. 649.22␣Experimental fishing exemption. Subpart C_Stock Rebuilding Program and Framework Adjustments to Management Measures 649.41␣Purpose and scope. 649.42␣Stock rebuilding program requirements and time frame. 649.43␣First-year framework specifications. 649.44␣Framework specifications after the first year of implementation. Figures_Part 649 Figure␣1_Standard Tetrahedral Corner Radar Reflector Figure␣2_American Lobster Management Areas Established for the Purposes of Regional Lobster Management Figure␣3_Seaward Boundary Lines of the Southern New England Nearshore Areas (Area 2) and the Offshore Area (Area 3) Authority: 16 U.S.C. 1801 et seq . Subpart A_General Provisions §649.1 Purpose and scope. This part implements the Fishery Management Plan for the American Lobster Fishery (FMP), as amended by the New England Fishery Management Council in consultation with the Mid-Atlantic Fishery Management Council and the Atlantic States Marine Fisheries Commission (ASMFC), and approved by the Assistant Administrator for Fisheries, NOAA. Red crab fishing gear, which is fished deeper than 200 fathoms (365.8 m), is gear not capable of taking lobsters, and is not subject to the provisions of this part. §649.2 Definitions. In addition to the definitions in the Magnuson Act and in §620.2 of this chapter, the terms used in this part have the following meanings: American lobster or lobster means the species Homarus americanus . Berried female means a female American lobster bearing eggs attached to the abdominal appendages. Carapace length is the straight line measurement from the rear of the eye socket parallel to the center line of the carapace to the posterior edge of the carapace. The carapace is the unsegmented body shell of the American lobster. Council means the New England Fishery Management Council. Dealer means any person who receives American lobsters for a commercial purpose from the owner or operator of a vessel issued a valid Federal vessel permit under this part, other than exclusively for transport on land. Dive vessel means any vessel carrying divers for a per capita fee or a charter fee. Effort Monitoring Team (EMT) means a group of technical experts made up of representatives from the Council, NMFS, the appropriate states, and a group of American lobster industry representatives (appointed by the Council), per management area, to each EMT. Escape vent means an opening in a lobster trap designed to allow lobster smaller than the legal minimum size to escape from the trap. Fishery Management Plan (FMP) means the Fishery Management Plan for American Lobsters, as amended. Ghost panel means a panel, or other mechanism, designed to allow for the escapement of lobster after a period of time if the trap has been abandoned or lost. Gross registered tonnage means the gross registered tonnage specified on the U.S. Coast Guard documentation for a vessel. Land means to enter port with fish on board, to begin offloading fish, or to offload fish. Lobster pot trawl means a number of lobster traps, all attached to a single groundline. Net tonnage means the net tonnage specified on the U.S. Coast Guard documentation for a vessel. Offload means to begin to remove, to remove, to pass over the rail, or otherwise take away fish from any vessel. Operator means the master or captain of the vessel, or other individual on board the vessel, who is in charge of that vessel's operations. Party/charter boat means any vessel carrying fishing persons or parties for a per capita fee or for a charter fee. Postmark means independently verifiable evidence of date of mailing, such as U.S. Postal Service postmark, United Parcel Service (U.P.S.) or other private carrier postmark, certified mail receipt, overnight mail receipt, or receipt received upon hand delivery to an authorized representative of NMFS. Recreational fishing means fishing that is not intended to, nor results in the barter, trade, or sale of fish. Recreational fishing vessel means any vessel from which no fishing other than recreational fishing is conducted. Charter and party boats and dive boats are not considered recreational fishing vessels. Regional Director means the Director, Northeast Region, NMFS, 1 Blackburn Drive, Gloucester, MA 01930&hyph;2298, or a designee. Re-rig or re-rigged means physical alteration of the vessel or its gear in order to transform the vessel into one capable of fishing commercially for American lobsters. Scrubbing is the forcible removal of eggs from a berried female American lobster. Under agreement for construction means that the keel has been laid and that there is a written agreement to construct a fishing vessel. V-notched American lobster means any female American lobster bearing a V-shaped notch in the flipper next to and to the right of the center flipper as viewed from the rear of the lobster (underside of the lobster down and tail toward the viewer). V-shaped notch means a straight-sided triangular cut, without setal hairs, as least 1/4 inch (0.64 cm) in depth and tapering to a point. Whole American lobster means a lobster with an intact and measurable body (tail and carapace). A cull whole American lobster is an American lobster with one or both claws missing. §649.3 Relation to other laws. (a) The relation of this part to other laws is set forth in §620.3 of this chapter. (b) Nothing in these regulations shall supersede more restrictive state management measures for American lobsters. §649.4 Vessel permits. (a) 1994 vessel permits . (1) Through December 31, 1994, any vessel of the United States fishing for American lobster in the EEZ must have been issued and carry on board a valid permit required by or issued under this part. The Regional Director may, by agreement with State agencies, recognize permits or licenses issued by those agencies endorsed for fishing for lobster in the EEZ, providing that such permitting programs accurately identify persons who fish in the EEZ, and that the Regional Director can either individually, or in concert with the state agency, act to suspend the permit or license for EEZ fishing for any violation under this part. (2) Alternate State EEZ permitting programs will be established through a letter of agreement between the Regional Director and the director of the State marine fisheries agency concerned. The letter of agreement will specify the information to be collected by the alternate EEZ permitting program and the mode and frequency of provision of that information to the Regional Director. The Regional Director will, in cooperation with the State director, arrange for notification of the existence and terms of any such agreements to the affected persons. Persons intending to fish in the EEZ should determine whether an alternate EEZ permitting program is in force for their state before applying for a Federal permit under paragraph (d) of this section. (3) Vessel owners or operators who apply for a fishing vessel permit under this section, or for a State permit endorsed for EEZ fishing under paragraph (a)(2) of this section, must agree, as a condition of the permit, that all the vessel's lobster fishing, catch, and gear (without regard to whether such fishing occurs in the EEZ or landward of the EEZ, and without regard to where such lobster, lobster meats, or parts, or gear are possessed, taken or landed) will be subject to all the requirements of this part. All such fishing, catch, and gear will remain subject to any applicable state or local requirements. If a requirement of this part and a conservation measure required by state or local law differ, any vessel owner or operator permitted to fish in the EEZ must comply with the more restrictive requirement. (b) Limited access American lobster permits . From January 1, 1995, through December 31, 1999, any vessel of the United States that fishes for, possesses, or lands American lobster, in or harvested from the EEZ, must have been issued and carry on board a valid Federal limited access American lobster permit. This requirement does not apply to party, charter and dive boats that possess six or fewer American lobsters, not intended for or resulting in trade, barter or sale, per person aboard the vessel at any time, or to recreational vessels, and vessels that fish exclusively in state waters for American lobsters. (1) Eligibility in 1995 . (i) To be eligible to obtain a limited access American lobster permit for 1995, a vessel must meet one of the following criteria: (A) The vessel or vessel owner had been issued a Federal American lobster permit, or a federally endorsed state American lobster permit, and landed American lobsters prior to March 25, 1991; or (B) The vessel was under written agreement for construction or for re-rigging for directed American lobster fishing as of March 25, 1991, and the vessel was issued a Federal American lobster permit, or federally endorsed state American lobster permit, and landed American lobster prior to March 25, 1992; or (C) The vessel is replacing a vessel that meets any of the criteria set forth in paragraphs (b)(1)(i)(A) or (B) of this section. (ii) No more than one vessel may qualify, at any one time, for a limited access American lobster permit based on that or another vessel's fishing and permit history. If more than one vessel owner claims eligibility for a limited access American lobster permit, based on one vessel's fishing and permit history, the Regional Director shall determine who is entitled to qualify for the limited access American lobster permit. (iii) A limited access American lobster permit for 1995 will not be issued unless an application for such permit is received by the Regional Director on or before December 31, 1995. (2) Eligibility in 1996 and thereafter . (i) To be eligible to renew or apply for a limited access American lobster permit for the years 1996&hyph;1999, a vessel must have been issued a limited access American lobster permit for the preceding year, or the vessel must be replacing a vessel that had been issued a limited access American lobster permit for the preceding year. If more than one vessel owner claims eligibility to apply for a limited access American lobster permit based on one vessel's fishing and permit history, the Regional Director shall determine who is entitled to qualify for the limited access American lobster permit. (ii) Beginning January 1, 2000, any vessel of the United States that fishes for, possesses, or lands American lobster, in or harvested from the EEZ, must have been issued and carry on board a valid Federal American lobster permit. This requirement does not apply to party, charter and dive boats that possess six or fewer American lobsters, not intended for or resulting in trade, barter, or sale, per person aboard the vessel at any time, or to recreational vessels and vessels that fish exclusively in state waters for American lobsters. The eligibility requirements for limited access permits for the years 1996 - 1999 are not applicable for obtaining an American lobster permit for the year 2000 and thereafter. (3) Change in ownership . The fishing and permit history of a vessel is presumed to transfer with the vessel whenever it is bought, sold, or otherwise transferred, unless there is a written agreement, signed by the transferor/seller and transferee/buyer, or other credible written evidence, verifying that the transferor/seller is retaining the vessel fishing and permit history for purposes of replacing the vessel. (4) Notification of eligibility for a limited access permit . (i) NMFS will attempt to notify all owners of vessels for which NMFS has credible evidence that they meet the criteria in paragraph (b)(1) of this section. (ii) If a vessel owner has not been notified that the vessel is eligible to be issued a limited access American lobster permit, and the vessel owner believes that there is credible evidence that the vessel does qualify under the pertinent criteria, the vessel owner may apply for a limited access American lobster permit by submitting the information described in paragraphs (d) through (e) of this section. In the event the application is denied, the applicant may appeal as specified in paragraph (b)(5) of this section. If, through either of these procedures, the Regional Director determines that the vessel meets the eligibility criteria, a limited access American lobster permit will be issued to the vessel. (5) Appeal of denial of limited access American lobster permit or of permit category assignment . (i) Any applicant denied a limited access American lobster permit may appeal the denial to the Regional Director within 30 days of the notice of denial. Any such appeal must be based on one or more of the following grounds, must be in writing, and must state the grounds for the appeal: (A) The information used by the Regional Director was based on mistaken or incorrect data; (B) The applicant was prevented by circumstances beyond his/her control from meeting relevant criteria; or (C) The applicant has new or additional information. (ii) The Regional Director will appoint a designee who will make the initial decision on the appeal. (iii) The appellant may request a review of the initial decision by the Regional Director by so requesting, in writing, within 30 days of the notice of initial decision. If the appellant does not request a review of the initial decision within 30 days, the initial decision shall become the final administrative action of the Department of Commerce. (iv) Recommendations to the Regional Director by a hearing officer . A hearing officer shall be appointed by the Regional Director to review the initial decision. The hearing officer shall make findings and a recommendation to the Regional Director, which shall be advisory only. (v) Upon receiving the findings and a recommendation, the Regional Director will issue a final decision on the appeal. The Regional Director's decision is the final administrative action of the Department of Commerce. (c) Condition . Vessel owners who apply for a permit under this section must agree, as a condition of the permit, that the vessel and vessel's fishing, catch, and pertinent gear (without regard to whether such fishing occurs in the EEZ or landward of the EEZ, and without regard to where such fish or gear are possessed, taken, or landed), are subject to all requirements of this part. The vessel and all such fishing, catch, and gear shall remain subject to all applicable state or local requirements. If a requirement of this part and a management measure required by state or local law differ, any vessel owner permitted to fish in the EEZ must comply with the more restrictive requirement. (d) Vessel permit application . Applicants for a permit under this section must submit a completed application on an appropriate form obtained from the Regional Director. The application must be signed by the owner of the vessel, or the owner's authorized representative, and be submitted to the Regional Director at least 30 days before the date on which the applicant desires to have the permit made effective. The Regional Director will notify the applicant of any deficiency in the application pursuant to this section. Applicants for 1995 limited access American lobster permits who have not been notified of eligibility by the Regional Director shall provide information with the application sufficient for the Regional Director to determine whether the vessel meets the eligibility requirements specified under paragraph (b)(1) of this section. Acceptable forms of proof include, but are not limited to, state weigh-out records, packout forms, and settlement sheets. (e) Information requirements . In addition to applicable information required to be provided by paragraph (d) of this section, an application for a Federal American lobster permit must contain at least the following information, and any other information required by the Regional Director: Vessel name; owner name, mailing address, and telephone number; U.S. Coast Guard documentation number and a copy of the vessel's U.S. Coast Guard documentation or, if undocumented, state registration number and a copy of the state registration; home port and principal port of landing; overall length; gross tonnage; net tonnage; engine horsepower; year the vessel was built; type of construction; type of propulsion; approximate fish-hold capacity; type of fishing gear used by the vessel; permit category; if the owner is a corporation, a copy of the Certificate of Incorporation; and the names and addresses of all shareholders owning 25 percent or more of the corporation's shares; if the owner is a partnership, a copy of the Partnership Agreement and the names and addresses of all partners; if there is more than one owner, names of all owners having more than a 25 percent interest; and name and signature of the owner or the owner's authorized representative. (f) Fees . The Regional Director may charge a fee to recover the administrative expense of issuing a permit required under this section. The amount of the fee shall be calculated in accordance with the procedures of the NOAA Finance Handbook for determining administrative costs of each special product or service. The fee may not exceed such costs and is specified with each application form. The appropriate fee must accompany each application; if it does not, the application will be considered incomplete for purposes of paragraph (g)(1) of this section. (g) Issuance . (1) Except as provided in subpart D of 15 CFR part 904 and under paragraph (b)(5) of this section, the Regional Director shall issue a Federal American lobster vessel permit within 30 days of receipt of the application unless: (i) The applicant has failed to submit a completed application. An application is complete when all requested forms, information, documentation, and fees, if applicable, have been received; or (ii) The application was not received by the Regional Director by the deadlines set forth in paragraph (b)(1)(iii) of this section; or (iii) The applicant and applicant's vessel failed to meet all eligibility requirements described in paragraphs (b)(1) and (2) of this section; or (iv) The applicant has failed to meet any other application requirements stated in this part. (2) Upon receipt of an incomplete or improperly executed application, the Regional Director shall notify the applicant of the deficiency in the application. If the applicant fails to correct the deficiency within 30 days following the date of notification, the application will be considered abandoned. (h) Expiration . A Federal American lobster permit will expire upon the renewal date specified in the permit. (i) Duration . A permit is valid until it is revoked, suspended, or modified under 15 CFR part 904, or until it otherwise expires, or ownership changes, or the applicant has failed to report any change in the information on the permit application to the Regional Director as specified in paragraph (l) of this section. (j) Replacement . Replacement permits, for an otherwise valid permit, may be issued by the Regional Director when requested in writing by the owner or authorized representative, stating the need for replacement, the name of the vessel, and the Federal Fisheries Permit number assigned. An application for a replacement permit will not be considered a new application. An appropriate fee may be charged for issuance of the replacement permit. (k) Transfer . Permits issued under this section are not transferable or assignable. A permit is valid only for the vessel and owner to whom it is issued. (l) Change in application information . Within 15 days after a change in the information contained in an application submitted under this section, a written notice of the change must be submitted to the Regional Director. If the written notice of the change in information is not received by the Regional Director within 15 days, the permit is void. (m) Alteration . Any permit that has been altered, erased, or mutilated is invalid. (n) Display . Any permit issued under this part must be maintained in legible condition and displayed for inspection upon request by any authorized officer. (o) Sanctions . Procedures governing enforcement-related permit sanctions and denials are found at subpart D of 15 CFR part 904. (p) Limited access American lobster permit renewal . To renew or apply for a limited access American lobster permit in 1995 and thereafter, a completed application must be received by the Regional Director by December 31 of the year before the permit is needed. Failure to renew a limited access American lobster permit in any year bars the renewal of the permit in subsequent years. (q) Abandonment or voluntary relinquishment of limited access American lobster permits . If a vessel's limited access American lobster permit is voluntarily relinquished to the Regional Director, or abandoned through failure to renew or otherwise, no limited access American lobster permit may be re-issued or renewed based on that vessel's history, or to any vessel relying on that vessel's history. §649.5 Operator permits. (a) General . Beginning on January 1, 1995, any operator of a vessel issued a Federal limited access American lobster permit under §649.4(b), or any operator of a vessel of the United States that fishes for, possesses, or lands American lobsters, in or harvested from the EEZ must have been issued and carry on board a valid operator's permit issued under this section. This requirement does not apply to party, charter, and dive boats that possess six or fewer American lobsters, not intended for or resulting in trade, barter or sale, per person aboard the vessel at any time, or to recreational vessels, and vessels that fish exclusively in state waters for American lobsters. (b) Operator application . Applicants for a permit under this section must submit a completed permit application on an appropriate form obtained from the Regional Director. The application must be signed by the applicant and submitted to the Regional Director at least 30 days prior to the date on which the applicant desires to have the permit made effective. The Regional Director will notify the applicant of any deficiency in the application, pursuant to this section. (c) Condition . Vessel operators who apply for an operator's permit under this section must agree, as a condition of this permit, that the operator and vessel's fishing, catch, crew size, and pertinent gear (without regard to whether such fishing occurs in the EEZ or landward of the EEZ, and without regard to where such fish or gear are possessed, taken, or landed), are subject to all requirements of this part while fishing in the EEZ or on board a vessel permitted under §649.4(b). The vessel and all such fishing, catch, and gear will remain subject to all applicable state or local requirements. Further, such operators must agree, as a condition of this permit, that if the permit is suspended or revoked pursuant to 15 CFR part 904, the operator cannot be on board any fishing vessel issued a Federal Fisheries Permit or any vessel subject to Federal fishing regulations while the vessel is at sea or engaged in offloading. If a requirement of this part and a management measure required by state or local law differ, any operator issued a permit under this part must comply with the more restrictive requirement. (d) Information requirements . An applicant must provide at least all the following information and any other information required by the Regional Director: Name, mailing address, and telephone number; date of birth; hair color; eye color; height; weight; social security number (optional) and signature of the applicant. The applicant must also provide two color passport- size photographs. (e) Fees . The Regional Director may charge a fee to recover the administrative expense of issuing a permit required under this section. The amount of the fee is calculated in accordance with the procedures of the NOAA Financial Handbook for determining the administrative costs of each special product or service. The fee may not exceed such costs and is specified with each application form. The appropriate fee must accompany each application; if it does not, the application will be considered incomplete for purposes of paragraph (f) of this section. (f) Issuance . Except as provided in subpart D of 15 CFR part 904, the Regional Director shall issue an operator's permit within 30 days of receipt of a completed application, if the criteria specified in this section are met. Upon receipt of an incomplete or improperly executed application, the Regional Director will notify the applicant of the deficiency in the application. If the applicant fails to correct the deficiency within 30 days following the date of notification, the application will be considered abandoned. (g) Expiration . A Federal operator permit will expire upon the renewal date specified in the permit. (h) Duration . A permit is valid until it is revoked, suspended, or modified under 15 CFR part 904, or otherwise expires, or the applicant has failed to report a change in the information on the permit application to the Regional Director as specified in paragraph (k) of this section. (i) Replacement . Replacement permits, for otherwise valid permits, may be issued by the Regional Director when requested in writing by the applicant, stating the need for replacement and the Federal operator permit number assigned. An applicant for a replacement permit must also provide two color passport-size photos of the applicant. An application for a replacement permit will not be considered a new application. An appropriate fee may be charged. (j) Transfer . Permits issued under this section are not transferable or assignable. A permit is valid only for the person to whom it is issued. (k) Change in application information . Notice of a change in the permit holder's name, address, or telephone number must be submitted in writing to, and received by, the Regional Director within 15 days of the change in information. If written notice of the change in information is not received by the Regional Director within 15 days, the permit is void. (l) Alteration . Any permit that has been altered, erased, or mutilated is invalid. (m) Display . Any permit issued under this part must be maintained in legible condition and displayed for inspection upon request by any authorized officer. (n) Sanctions . Vessel operators with suspended or revoked permits may not be on board a federally permitted fishing vessel in any capacity while the vessel is at sea or engaged in offloading. Procedures governing enforcement related permit sanctions and denials are found at subpart D of 15 CFR part 904. (o) Vessel owner responsibility . Vessel owners are responsible for ensuring that their vessels are operated by an individual with a valid operator's permit issued under this section. §649.6 Dealer permits. (a) All dealers must have been issued, and have in their possession, a valid permit issued under this section. (b) Dealer application . Applicants for a permit under this section must submit a completed application on an appropriate form provided by the Regional Director. The application must be signed by the applicant and submitted to the Regional Director at least 30 days before the date upon which the applicant desires to have the permit made effective. For 1994, a copy of an applicant's completed application will serve as a temporary permit until the applicant has received a permanent permit. The Regional Director will notify the applicant of any deficiency in the application, pursuant to this section. (c) Information requirements . Applications must contain at least the following information and any other information required by the Regional Director: Company name, place(s) of business, mailing address(es) and telephone number(s); owner's name; dealer permit number (if a renewal); and name and signature of the person responsible for the truth and accuracy of the report. If the dealer is a corporation, a copy of the Certificate of Incorporation must be included with the application. If the dealer is a partnership, a copy of the Partnership Agreement and the names and addresses of all partners must be included with the application. (d) Fees . The Regional Director may charge a fee to recover the administrative expense of issuing a permit required under this section. The amount of the fee is calculated in accordance with the procedures of the NOAA Finance Handbook for determining the administrative costs of each special product or service. The fee may not exceed such costs and is specified with each application form. The appropriate fee must accompany each application; if it does not, the application will be considered incomplete for purposes of paragraph (e) of this section. (e) Issuance . Except as provided in subpart D of 15 CFR part 904, the Regional Director will issue a permit at any time during the fishing year to an applicant, unless the applicant has failed to submit a completed application. An application is complete when all requested forms, information, and documentation have been received. Upon receipt of an incomplete or improperly executed application, the Regional Director will notify the applicant of the deficiency in the application. If the applicant fails to correct the deficiency within 30 days following the date of notification, the application will be considered abandoned. (f) Expiration . A Federal dealer permit will expire upon the renewal date specified in the permit. (g) Duration . A permit is valid until it is revoked, suspended, or modified under 15 CFR part 904, or otherwise expires, or ownership changes, or the applicant has failed to report any change in the information on the permit application to the Regional Director as required by paragraph (j) of this section. (h) Replacement . Replacement permits, for otherwise valid permits, may be issued by the Regional Director when requested in writing by the applicant, stating the need for replacement and the Federal dealer permit number assigned. An application for a replacement permit will not be considered a new application. An appropriate fee may be charged. (i) Transfer . Permits issued under this section are not transferable or assignable. A permit is valid only for the person, or other business entity, to which it is issued. (j) Change in application information . Within 15 days after a change in the information contained in an application submitted under this section, a written report of the change must be submitted to, and received by, the Regional Director. If written notice of the change in information is not received by the Regional Director within 15 days, the permit is void. (k) Alteration . Any permit that has been altered, erased, or mutilated is invalid. (l) Display . Any permit, or a valid duplicate thereof, issued under this section must be maintained in legible condition and displayed for inspection upon request by any authorized officer. (m) Federal versus state requirements . If a requirement of this part differs from a fisheries management measure required by state law, any dealer issued a Federal dealer permit must comply with the more restrictive requirement. (n) Sanctions . Procedures governing enforcement-related permit sanctions and denials are found at subpart D of 15 CFR part 904. §649.7 Vessel identification. (a) Vessel name . Each fishing vessel subject to this part that is over 25 ft (7.6 m) in length must display its name on the port and starboard sides of its bow and, if possible, on its stern. (b) Official number . Each fishing vessel subject to this part that is over 25 ft (7.6 m) in length must display its official number on the port and starboard sides of its deckhouse or hull, and on an appropriate weather deck, so as to be visible from above by enforcement vessels and aircraft. The official number is the U.S. Coast Guard documentation number or the vessel's state registration number for vessels not required to be documented under chapter 123 of title 46 U.S.C. (c) Numerals . The official number must be permanently affixed in contrasting block Arabic numerals at least 18 inches (45.7 cm) in height for vessels over 65 ft (19.8 m), and at least 10 inches (25.4 cm) in height for all other vessels over 25 ft (7.6 m) in length. (d) Duties of owner and operator . The owner and operator of each vessel subject to this part must: (1) Keep the vessel name and official number clearly legible and in good repair; and (2) Ensure that no part of the vessel, its rigging, its fishing gear, or any other object obstructs the view of the official number from an enforcement vessel or aircraft. §649.8 Prohibitions. (a) In addition to the general prohibitions specified in §620.7 of this chapter, it is unlawful for any person owning or operating a vessel issued a Federal American lobster permit under §649.4 to do any of the following: (1) Retain on board, land, or possess at or after landing, American lobsters that fail to meet the carapace length standard specified in §649.20(b). All American lobsters will be subject to inspection and enforcement, up to and including the time when a dealer receives or possesses American lobsters for a commercial purpose. (2) Retain on board, land, or possess any American lobster or parts thereof in violation of the mutilation standards specified in §649.20(c). (3) Retain on board, possess, or land any berried female American lobster specified in §649.20(d). (4) Remove eggs from any berried female American lobster, land, or possess any such lobster from which eggs have been removed. (5) Retain on board, land, or possess any V-notched female American lobsters throughout the range of the stock. (6) Possess, deploy, haul, harvest lobster from, or carry aboard a vessel any gear not identified, marked, vented, and panelled in accordance with the requirements specified in §649.21, unless such gear has been rendered unfishable. (7) Fish for, land, or possess American lobsters after December 31, 1994, unless the operator of the vessel has been issued an operator's permit under §649.5, and the permit is on board the vessel and is valid. (8) Fail to report to the Regional Director within 15 days any change in the information contained in the permit application as required under §649.4(l) or §649.5(k). (9) Make any false statement in connection with an application under §649.4 or §649.5. (10) Fail to affix and maintain permanent markings, as required by §649.7. (11) Sell, transfer, or barter or attempt to sell, transfer, or barter to a dealer any American lobsters, unless the dealer has a valid Federal Dealer's Permit issued under §649.6. (b) In addition to the prohibitions specified in paragraph (a) of this section, it is unlawful for any person owning or operating a vessel that has not been issued a limited access American lobster permit as described under §649.4(b), to possess on board a vessel or land American lobsters unless the vessel is a party, charter, or dive boat and there are six or fewer American lobsters per person on such boats, and the lobsters are not sold, traded or bartered, or unless the vessel is a recreational vessel or a vessel fishing for American lobsters exclusively in state waters. (c) In addition to the general prohibitions specified in §620.7 of this chapter and the prohibitions specified in paragraphs (a) and (b) of this section, it is unlawful for any person to do any of the following: (1) Possess on board a vessel or land American lobsters unless: (i) The American lobsters were harvested by a vessel that has been issued and carries on board a valid Federal American lobster permit under §649.4(a); or a valid limited access American lobster permit under §649.4(b); or (ii) The American lobsters were harvested by a vessel without a Federal American lobster permit and that fishes for American lobsters exclusively in state waters; or (iii) The American lobsters were harvested by a party, charter, or dive vessel that possesses six or fewer American lobsters per person on board the vessel and the lobsters are not intended to be or are not traded, bartered, or sold; or (iv) The American lobsters were harvested by a recreational fishing vessel. (2) Sell, barter, or trade, or otherwise transfer, or attempt to sell, barter, or trade, or otherwise transfer, for a commercial purpose, any American lobsters from a vessel, unless the vessel has been issued a valid Federal American lobster permit under §649.4, or the American lobsters were harvested by a vessel without a Federal American lobster permit that fishes for American lobsters exclusively in state waters; (3) Purchase, possess, or receive for a commercial purpose, or attempt to purchase, possess, or receive for a commercial purpose, as, or in the capacity of, a dealer, American lobsters taken from or harvested by a fishing vessel issued a Federal American lobster permit, unless in possession of a valid dealer's permit issued under §649.6; (4) Purchase, possess, or receive for commercial purposes, or attempt to purchase or receive for commercial purposes, as, or in the capacity of, a dealer, American lobsters caught by a vessel other than one issued a valid Federal American lobster permit under §649.4, unless the American lobsters were harvested by a vessel without a Federal American lobster permit and that fishes for American lobsters exclusively in state waters; (5) Beginning January 1, 1995, to be, or act as, an operator of a vessel fishing for or possessing American lobsters in or from the EEZ, or issued a Federal American lobster permit under §649.4 (b), without having been issued and possessing a valid operator's permit issued under §649.5. (6) Assault, resist, oppose, impede, harass, intimidate, or interfere with either a NMFS-approved observer aboard a vessel, or an authorized officer conducting any search, inspection, investigation, or seizure in connection with enforcement of this part; (7) Make any false statement, oral or written, to an authorized officer, concerning the taking, catching, harvesting, landing, purchase, sale, or transfer of any American lobsters; (8) Violate any provision of this part, the Magnuson Act, or any regulation, permit, or notification issued under the Magnuson Act or these regulations; (9) Possess or land any American lobsters harvested in or from the EEZ in violation of §649.20; or (10) Ship, transport, offer for sale, sell, or purchase, in interstate or foreign commerce, any whole live American lobster in violation of §649.20. (d) Any person possessing, or landing American lobsters at or prior to the time when those American lobsters are landed, or are received or possessed by a dealer, is subject to all of the prohibitions specified in paragraphs (a), (b) and (c) of this section, unless the American lobsters were harvested by a vessel without a Federal American lobster permit and that fishes for American lobsters exclusively in state waters; or are from a party, charter, or dive vessel that possesses or possessed six or fewer American lobsters per person aboard the vessel at any time and the lobsters are not intended for sale, trade, or barter; or are from a recreational vessel. (e) Presumption . American lobsters that are possessed, or landed at or prior to the time when the American lobsters are received by a dealer, or American lobsters that are possessed by a dealer, are presumed to be harvested from the EEZ or by a vessel with a Federal lobster permit. A preponderance of all submitted evidence that such American lobsters were harvested by a vessel without a Federal American lobster permit and fishing exclusively for American lobsters in state waters will be sufficient to rebut the presumption. (f) The possession of egg-bearing female American lobsters, V-notched female American lobsters, or American lobsters that are smaller than the minimum size set forth in §649.20(b), will be prima facie evidence that such American lobsters were taken or imported in violation of these regulations. Evidence that such American lobsters were harvested by a vessel not holding a permit under this part and fishing exclusively within state or foreign waters will be sufficient to rebut the presumption. §649.9 Facilitation of enforcement. See §620.8 of this chapter. §649.10 Penalties. See §620.9 of this chapter. Subpart B_Management Measures §649.20 Harvesting and landing requirements. (a) Condition . By being issued a Federal limited access American lobster permit, the vessel owner is subject to all measures in this subpart, regardless of where American lobsters were harvested. (b) Carapace length . (1) The minimum carapace length for all American lobsters harvested in or from the EEZ is 31/4 inches (8.26 cm). (2) The minimum carapace length for all American lobsters landed, harvested, or possessed at or after landing by vessels issued a Federal American lobster permit, is 31/4 inches (8.26 cm). (3) No person may ship, transport, offer for sale, sell, or purchase, in interstate or foreign commerce, any whole live American lobster that is smaller than the minimum size specified in this paragraph (b). (c) Mutilation . (1) No person may remove meat or any body appendage from any American lobster harvested in or from the EEZ before landing, or to have in possession on board any American lobster part other than whole lobsters. (2) No owner, operator or person aboard a vessel issued a Federal American lobster permit may remove meat or any body appendage from any American lobster before landing, or to have in possession on board any American lobster part other than whole lobsters. (d) Berried females . (1) Any berried female American lobster harvested in or from the EEZ must be returned to the sea immediately. (2) Any berried female American lobster harvested or possessed by a vessel issued a Federal American lobster permit must be returned to the sea immediately. (3) No person may ship, transport, offer for sale, sell, or purchase, in interstate or foreign commerce, any berried female American lobster as specified in this paragraph (d). (e) Scrubbing . (1) No person may remove extruded eggs attached to the abdominal appendages from any female American lobster harvested on or from the EEZ. (2) No owner, operator or person aboard a vessel issued a Federal American lobster permit may remove extruded eggs attached to the abdominal appendages from any female American lobster. (3) No person may ship, transport, offer for sale, sell, or purchase, in interstate or foreign commerce, any whole live American lobster that bears evidence of the forcible removal of extruded eggs from its abdominal appendages as specified in this paragraph (e). §649.21 Gear identification and marking, escape vent, and ghost panel requirements. (a) Identification . All lobster gear deployed in the EEZ or possessed by a person whose vessel is permitted for fishing in the EEZ, and not permanently attached to the vessel, must be legibly and indelibly marked with one of the following codes of identification: (1) A number assigned by the Regional Director; and/or (2) Whatever positive identification marking is required by the vessel's home-port state. (b) Marking . In the areas of the EEZ described in paragraph (b)(4) of this section, lobster pot trawls are to be marked as follows: (1) Lobster pot trawls of three or fewer pots must be marked with a single buoy. (2) Lobster pot trawls consisting of more than three pots must have a radar reflector and a single flag or pennant on the westernmost end (marking the half compass circle from magnetic south through west, to and including north), while the easternmost end (meaning the half compass circle from magnetic north through east, to and including south) of an American lobster pot trawl must be marked with a radar reflector only. Standard tetrahedral corner radar reflectors (see Figure 1 of this part) of at least 8 inches (20.32 cm)(both in height and width, and made from metal) must be employed. (3) No American lobster pot trawl shall exceed 1.5 nautical miles (2.78 km) in length, as measured from buoy to buoy. (4) Gear marking requirements apply in the following areas: (i) Gulf of Maine gear area . All waters of the EEZ north of 42 20 ’ N. lat. seaward of a line drawn 12 nautical miles (22.2 km) from the baseline of the territorial sea; (ii) Georges Bank gear Area . All waters of the EEZ south of 42 20 ’ N. lat. and east of 70 00 ’ W. long. or the outer boundary of the territorial sea, whichever lies farther east; (iii) Southern New England gear Area . All waters of the EEZ west of 70 00 ’ W. long., east of 71 30 ’ W. long. at a depth greater than 25 fathoms (45.72 m); and (iv) Mid-Atlantic gear Area . All waters of the EEZ, west of 71 30 ’ W. long. and north of 36 33 ’ N. lat. at a depth greater than 40 fathoms (73.15 m). (c) Escape vents . All American lobster traps deployed in the EEZ or possessed by a person whose vessel is permitted for fishing in the EEZ, as specified under §649.4, must be constructed to include one of the following escape vents in the parlor section of the trap. The vent must be located in such a manner that it would not be blocked or obstructed by any portion of the trap, associated gear, or the sea floor in normal use. (1) The specifications for escape vents are as follows: (i) A rectangular portal with an unobstructed opening not less than 17/8 inches (4.76 cm) by 53/4 inches (14.61 cm); (ii) Two circular portals with unobstructed openings not less than 23/8 inches (6.03 cm) in diameter. (2) The Regional Director may, at the request of, or after consultation with, the Lobster Oversight Committee of the Council, approve, and publish in the Federal Register any other type of acceptable escape vent that the Regional Director finds to be consistent with paragraphs (c)(1)(i) and (ii) of this section. (d) Ghost panel . Lobster traps not constructed entirely of wood must contain a ghost panel. (1) The specifications of this requirement are as follows: (i) The opening to be covered by the ghost panel must be rectangular and shall not be less than 33/4 inches (9.53 cm) by 33/4 inches (9.53 cm). (ii) The panel must be constructed of, or fastened to the trap with, one of the following untreated materials: Wood lath, cotton, hemp, sisal or jute twine not greater than 3/16 inch (0.48 cm) in diameter, or non-stainless, uncoated ferrous metal not greater than 3/32 inch (0.24 cm) in diameter. (iii) The door of the trap may serve as the ghost panel, if fastened with a material specified in paragraph (d)(1)(ii) of this section. (iv) The ghost panel must be located in the outer parlor(s) of the trap and not the bottom of the trap. (2) The Regional Director may, at the request of, or after consultation with, the Lobster Oversight Committee of the Council, approve, and publish in the Federal Register , any other design, mechanism, material, or specification not described in the regulations in this part that serves to create an escape portal not less than 33/4 inches (9.53 cm) by 33/4 inches (9.53 cm). (e) Enforcement action . Unidentified, unmarked, unvented, or improperly vented American lobster traps will be seized and disposed of in accordance with the provisions of part 219 of this title. §649.22 Experimental fishing exemption. (a) The Regional Director may exempt any person or vessel from the requirements of this part for the conduct of experimental fishing beneficial to the management of the American lobster resource or fishery. (b) The Regional Director may not grant such exemption unless it is determined that the purpose, design, and administration of the exemption is consistent with the objectives of the FMP, the provisions of the Magnuson Act, and other applicable law, and that granting the exemption will not: (1) Have a detrimental effect on the American lobster resource and fishery; or (2) Create significant enforcement problems. (c) Each vessel participating in any exempted experimental fishing activity is subject to all provisions of this part, except those necessarily relating to the purpose and nature of the exemption. The exemption will be specified in a letter issued by the Regional Director to each vessel participating in the exempted activity. This letter must be carried aboard the vessel seeking the benefit of such exemption. Subpart C_Stock Rebuilding Program and Framework Adjustments to Management Measures §649.41 Purpose and scope. The purpose of this subpart is to specify the requirements and framework procedures for implementing the Stock Rebuilding Program, intended to eliminate overfishing in any resource areas. §649.42 Stock rebuilding program requirements and time frame. (a) General . (1) The Council has until July 20, 1995 to submit to NMFS management measures to achieve the objectives of the FMP. The measures must be designed to achieve the FMP objectives for reducing fishing mortality within 5 years for the stock in the Gulf of Maine segment of the fishery and 10 years for the Southern New England segment of the stock. Such measures may be submitted through the Magnuson Act amendment process or through the first-year area management framework specifications in §649.43. (2) In developing such management measures, the Council shall submit management measures to reduce fishing mortality in each of four management areas specified in paragraph (b) of this section. These management measures shall be implemented according to the first-year area management framework specifications in §649.43. (3) If the Council has not submitted management measures sufficient to achieve the objectives of the FMP on or before July 20, 1995, the Secretary shall determine, according to provisions of 16 U.S.C. 1854(c), whether to prepare an amendment to the FMP. (b) Management areas . The Stock Rebuilding Program to be submitted by the Council shall be developed based on the status of stock of American lobsters and management considerations for each of the areas described and defined in this paragraph (b) (see Figure 2 of this part). (1) Area 1. Near-shore EEZ Waters of the Gulf of Maine. This area is defined by the area bounded by straight lines (rhumb lines) connecting the following points, in the order stated, and the territorial sea: ␣ 1Point 1Latitude 1Longitude A 44 ○04 N. 67 ○19 ’ W. and northward along the irregular U.S. - Canada Maritime Boundary to the territorial sea. B 43 ○03 N. 70 ○00 W. C 42 ○14 N. 70 ○00 W. D 42 ○08 N. 69 ○55 W. E 42 ○06 N. 70 ○04 W. (2) Area 2. Near-shore EEZ Waters of Southern New England. This area is defined by the area bounded by straight lines (rhumb lines) connecting the following points in the order stated and the territorial sea: ␣ 1Point 1Latitude 1Longitude E 42 ○06 N. 70 ○04 W. D 42 ○08 N. 69 ○55 W. F 41 ○10 N. 69 ○06 W. G 40 ○46 N. 71 ○34 W. H 41 ○06 N. 71 ○43 W. I 41 ○05 N. 71 ○49 W. (3) Area 3. EEZ Offshore Waters. This area is defined by the area bounded by straight lines (rhumb lines) connecting the following points, in the order stated, and westerly of the U.S. - Canada Maritime Boundary: ␣ 1Point 1␣ 1Longitude A 44 ○04 N. 67 ○19 W. and northward along the irregular U.S. - Canada Maritime Boundary to the territorial sea. B 43 ○03 N. 70 ○00 W. C 42 ○14 N. 70 ○00 W. D 42 ○08 N. 69 ○55 W. F 41 ○10 N. 69 ○06 W. G 40 ○46 N. 71 ○34 W. J 40 ○13 N. 72 ○44 W. K 38 ○39 N. 73 ○24 W. L 38 ○12 N. 73 ○55 W. M 37 ○12 N. 74 ○44 W. N 35 ○41 N. 75 ○10 W. O 35 ○15 N. 75 ○28 W. (4) Area 4. Near-shore EEZ Waters of the Middle Atlantic. This area is defined by the area bounded by straight lines (rhumb lines) connecting the following points, in the order stated, and the territorial sea: ␣ 1Point 1Latitude 1Longitude I 41 ○05 N. 71 ○49 W. H 41 ○06 N. 71 ○43 W. G 40 ○46 N. 71 ○34 W. J 40 ○13 N. 72 ○44 W. K 38 ○39 N. 73 ○24 W. L 38 ○12 N. 73 ○55 W. M 37 ○12 N. 74 ○44 W. N 35 ○41 N. 75 ○10 W. O 35 ○15 N. 75 ○28 W. (c) Effort Management Teams (EMT) . (1) The Council shall establish EMTs for each area specified in paragraph (b) of this section, for the purpose of making recommendations to the Council on management measures to achieve the objectives of the FMP. (2) Members of each EMT shall be appointed by the Council, in consultation with appropriate states and NMFS. Members of the EMT shall consist of a group of technical representatives that serve on each EMT and a group of representatives from the lobster industry, based on their geographical affiliation with an EMT. The Council may decide the number of representatives and operating procedures of the EMTs. (3) No later than January 20, 1995, each EMT shall report its recommendations for management measures for the stock rebuilding program for the area it represents to the Council. §649.43 First year framework specifications. (a) On or before January 20, 1995, each EMT shall submit its recommendations for management measures for the area it represents to the Council. In developing these recommendations, the EMTs may consider and recommend additional restrictions or limitations on vessels participating in the lobster fishery according to the categories and guidelines contained in paragraph (b) of this section. (b) After receiving the recommendations of the EMTs, the Council shall determine what management measures are necessary for each management area, in order to achieve the objectives of stock rebuilding specified in the FMP. For the management measures the Council determines are necessary to meet FMP objectives, the Council shall provide appropriate rationale and economic and biological analysis of the determinations. The Council shall make these determinations over the span of at least two Council meetings and provide the public with advance notice of, and opportunity to comment on, the determinations and the analyses before making final recommendations to be submitted to NMFS. The Council's recommendation on necessary management measures may come from one or more of the following categories: (1) Minimum-size changes; (2) A maximum-size limit; (3) Trap limits; (4) Seasonal closures of one or more management areas; (5) Closed areas or zones within a management area; (6) Restrictions on allowable fishing time; (7) Restrictions on allowable catches; (8) Permitting restrictions; (9) Additional restrictions on gear; (10) Overfishing definition; (11) Limitations on participation in the fishery in accordance with the control date guidelines listed below. These guidelines will apply until a stock rebuilding program is established. (i) It is the intent of the Council that in the event that a system of assigning fishing rights is developed as part of the FMP, such assignments shall be based upon historical levels of participation in the fishery prior to March 25, 1991, with consideration for recent investments that have not yet been reflected in measures of participation. (ii) New or re-rigged vessels will be given consideration in the assignment of fishing rights if: (A) They were under construction or re-rigging for directed lobster fishing as of March 25, 1991, as evidenced by written construction contracts, work orders, equipment purchases, or other evidence of substantial investment and intent to participate in the lobster fishery; and (B) They possessed an American lobster permit and landed lobster prior to March 25, 1992. (iii) The public is further notified that it is the intent of the Council that historical participation will transfer with a vessel, for transfers made after March 25, 1991, unless such transfer is accompanied by a written document indication the agreement of both buyer and seller that any future fishing rights applicable to that vessel are not being transferred with the vessel. (iv) The Council further intends that any system of assigning fishing rights will take into consideration the following concerns relative to individuals or corporations that have sold a vessel within the time that may be chosen to determine historical fishing rights: (A) The degree of economic dependence upon the lobster fishery including, but not limited to, the percentage of income derived from the lobster fishery; (B) Extent of past participation in the lobster fishery; and (C) Demonstration of intent prior to March 25, 1991, to re-enter the lobster fishery with a different vessel. (12) Any other restrictions that the Council may designate for the purpose of reducing or controlling fishing mortality rates, except that an Individual Transferable Quota (ITQ) system would require a full FMP amendment. (c) After developing necessary management measures and receiving public testimony, the Council shall make a recommendation to the Regional Director on or before July 20, 1995. The Council's recommendation must include supporting rationale and, if management measures are recommended, an analysis of impacts, and a recommendation to the Regional Director on whether to publish the management measures as a final rule. If the Council recommends that the management measures should be published as a final rule, the Council must consider at least the following factors and provide support and analysis for each factor considered: (1) Whether the availability of data on which the recommended management measures are based allows for adequate time to publish a proposed rule, and whether regulations have to be in place for an entire harvest/fishing season; (2) Whether there has been adequate notice and opportunity for participation by the public and members of the affected industry in the development of the Council's recommended management measures; (3) Whether there is an immediate need to protect the resource; and (4) Whether there will be a continuing evaluation of management measures adopted, following their promulgation as a final rule. (d) If the Council's recommendation includes adjustments or additions to management measures, after reviewing the Council's recommendation and supporting information: (1) If the Regional Director concurs with the Council's recommended management measures and determines that the recommended management measures may be published as a final rule, based on the factors specified in paragraph (c) of this section, the action will be published in the Federal Register as a final rule; or (2) If the Regional Director concurs with the Council's recommendation and determines that the recommended management measures should be published first as a proposed rule, the action will be published as a proposed rule in the Federal Register . After additional public comment, if the Regional Director concurs with the Council recommendation, the action will be published as a final rule in the Federal Register ; or (3) If the Regional Director does not concur, the Council will be notified, in writing, of the reasons for the non-concurrence. (e) At any time, the Council may make other adjustments to management measures implemented under this part pursuant to the provisions in §649.44. (f) Nothing in this section is meant to diminish the authority of the Secretary to take emergency action under section 305(c) of the Magnuson Act. §649.44 Framework specifications after the first year of implementation. (a) Annually, upon request from the Council, the Regional Director will provide the Council with information of the status of the American lobster resource, based on the most recent stock assessment report. (b) The Council and Atlantic States Fisheries Commission, through consultation with the ASMFC Lobster Scientific Committee within the stock assessment process and with the EMTs, shall continue to monitor the effectiveness of the Stock Rebuilding Program and to ensure, to the extent possible, that regional measures (within a Management Area) do not shift costs from one Management Area to another. (c) In addition, the EMTs, on at least an annual basis, shall determine the extent to which the objectives of the FMP are being achieved and shall make recommendations to the Council for further management actions, if required. (d) After receiving the EMT recommendations, the Council shall determine whether adjustments to, or additional management measures are necessary to meet the goals and objectives of the FMP. After considering the EMT's recommendations, or at any other time, if the Council determines that adjustments to, or additional management measures are necessary, it shall develop and analyze appropriate management actions over the span of at least two Council meetings. The Council shall provide the appropriate rationale and economic and biological analysis for its recommendation, utilizing the most current catch, effort, and other relevant data from the fishery. The Council shall provide the public with advance notice of the availability of both the proposals and the analyses, and opportunity to comment on them prior to, and at, the second Council meeting. The Council's recommendation on adjustments or additions to management measures may come from one or more of the following categories: (1) Minimum-size changes; (2) A maximum-size limit; (3) Trap limits; (4) Seasonal closures of one or more management areas; (5) Closed areas or zones within a management area; (6) Restrictions on allowable fishing time; (7) Restrictions on allowable catches; (8) Permitting restrictions; (9) Additional restrictions on gear; (10) Overfishing definition; (11) Limitations on participation in the fishery in accordance with the control date guidelines contained in §649.44(b)(11). These guidelines will apply until a stock rebuilding program is established. (12) Any other restrictions which the Council may designate for the purpose of reducing or controlling fishing mortality rates, except that an Individual Transferable Quota (ITQ) system would require a full FMP amendment. (e) After developing management actions and receiving public testimony, the Council shall make a recommendation to the Regional Director. The Council's recommendation must include supporting rationale and, if management measures are recommended, an analysis of impacts, and a recommendation to the Regional Director on whether to publish the management measures as a final rule. If the Council recommends that the management measures should be published as a final rule, the Council must consider at least the following factors and provide support and analysis for each factor considered: (1) Whether the availability of data on which the recommended management measures are based allows for adequate time to publish a proposed rule, and whether regulations have to be in place for an entire harvest/fishing season; (2) Whether there has been adequate notice and opportunity for participation by the public and members of the affected industry in the development of the Council's recommended management measures; (3) Whether there is an immediate need to protect the resource; and (4) Whether there will be a continuing evaluation of management measures adopted, following their promulgation as a final rule. (f) If the Council's recommendation includes adjustments or additions to management measures, after reviewing the Council's recommendation and supporting information: (1) If the Regional Director concurs with the Council's recommended management measures and determines that the recommended management measures may be published as a final rule, based on the factors specified in paragraph (d) of this section, the action will be published in the Federal Register as a final rule; or (2) If the Regional Director concurs with the Council's recommendation and determines that the recommended management measures should be published first as a proposed rule, the action will be published as a proposed rule in the Federal Register . After additional public comment, if the Regional Director concurs with the Council recommendation, the action will be published as a final rule in the Federal Register ; or (3) If the Regional Director does not concur, the Council will be notified, in writing, of the reasons for the non-concurrence. (g) Nothing in this section shall impair the authority of the Secretary to take emergency action under section 305(c) of the Magnuson Act. BILLING CODE 3510&hyph;22&hyph;F&hyph;P E:GRAPHICSER21JN94.000 E:GRAPHICSER21JN94.001 E:GRAPHICSER21JN94.002 [FR Doc. 94&hyph;14989 Filed 6&hyph;20&hyph;94; 8:45 am] BILLING CODE 3510&hyph;22&hyph;F&hyph;C
